Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-413 Actions on bond. Action on
the attorney's bond or to recover against any such deposit made in lieu thereof
may be brought at any time by one or more subscribers suffering loss through a
violation of the conditions thereof or by a receiver or liquidator of the
insurer. Amounts so recovered shall be deposited in and become part of the
insurer's funds. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next